lexc-files/prs-num/negative-present-optative.txt
!===========================================
LEXICON IntrOptNEG
!  person/number markers for
!     intransitive negative present optative 
!===========================================
!--------------------|
^[2Sg]:^vek  Enclitic;
^[2Pl]:^fsi  Enclitic;
^[2Du]:^ftek Enclitic;
!--------------------|

!=========================================
LEXICON TrnsOptNEG
!  person/number markers for
!     transitive negative present optative 
!=========================================

! exceptions for ^[Trns.Opt.NEG.2--.3Pl] forms
!----------------------|-------------------------|----------------------------|
^[2Sg.3Sg]:^n  Enclitic;                           ^[2Sg.3Du]:^gkenka Enclitic;
^[2Pl.3Sg]:^n  Enclitic;                           ^[2Pl.3Du]:^gkenka Enclitic;
^[2Du.3Sg]:^n  Enclitic;                           ^[2Du.3Du]:^gkenka Enclitic;
!----------------------|-------------------------|----------------------------|
^[2Sg.1Sg]:^ma Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Pl]:^mta Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Du]:^mtung  Enclitic;
^[2Pl.1Sg]:^ma Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Pl]:^mta Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Du]:^mtung  Enclitic;
^[2Du.1Sg]:^ma Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Pl]:^mta Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Du]:^mtung  Enclitic;
!----------------------|-------------------------|----------------------------|
